Washington statutes.
RCW 7.54.090

Report of open market sale.

(1) Unless required to do so within a shorter time under chapter 7.52 RCW, a broker appointed under RCW 7.54.080(1) to offer heirs property for open market sale shall file a report with the court not later than seven days after receiving an offer to purchase the property for at least the value determined under RCW 7.54.040 or 7.54.080.

(2) The report required by subsection (1) of this section must contain the following information:

(a) A description of the property to be sold to each buyer;

(b) The name of each buyer;

(c) The proposed purchase price;

(d) The terms and conditions of the proposed sale, including the terms of any owner financing;

(e) The amounts to be paid to lienholders;

(f) A statement of contractual or other arrangements or conditions of the broker's commission; and

(g) Other material facts relevant to the sale.

[ 2023 c 6 s 111.]